Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 4. Payment of Compensation.

Collateral references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d, Workers’ Compensation, §§ 674-684.

101 C.J.S., Workers’ Compensation, §§ 826-848.

Sec. 23.30.150.
Commencement of compensation.

Compensation may not be allowed for the first three days of the disability, except the benefits provided for in AS

23.30.095

; if, however, the injury results in disability of more than 28 days, compensation shall be allowed from the date of the disability.

History.

(§ 5(1) ch 193 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.30.155.
Payment of compensation.

Compensation under this chapter shall be paid periodically, promptly, and directly to the person entitled to it, without an award, except where liability to pay compensation is controverted by the employer. To controvert a claim, the employer must file a notice, in a format prescribed by the director, stating

that the right of the employee to compensation is controverted;

the name of the employee;

the name of the employer;

the date of the alleged injury or death; and

the type of compensation and all grounds on which the right to compensation is controverted.

The first installment of compensation becomes due on the 14th day after the employer has knowledge of the injury or death. On this date all compensation then due shall be paid. Subsequent compensation shall be paid in installments, every 14 days, except where the board determines that payment in installments should be made monthly or at some other period.

The insurer or adjuster shall notify the division in a format prescribed by the director that the payment of compensation has begun or has been increased, decreased, suspended, terminated, resumed, or changed in type. An initial report shall be filed not later than 28 days after the date of issuing the first payment of compensation. If, at any time, 21 days or more pass and no compensation payment is issued, a report notifying the division of the termination or suspension of compensation shall be filed not later than 28 days after the date the last compensation payment was issued. A report shall also be filed not later than 28 days after the date of issuing a payment increasing, decreasing, resuming, or changing the type of compensation paid. When the insurer or adjuster files a report, the division shall notify the employee of the payment or change in payment of compensation. If the division is not notified within the 28 days prescribed by this subsection for reporting, the insurer or adjuster shall pay a civil penalty of $100 for the first day plus $10 for each day after the first day that the notice was not given. Total penalties under this subsection may not exceed $1,000 for a failure to file a required report. Penalties assessed under this subsection are eligible for reduction under (m) of this section. A penalty assessed under this subsection after penalties have been reduced under (m) of this section shall be increased by 25 percent and shall bear interest at the rate established under AS

45.45.010

.

If the employer controverts the right to compensation, the employer shall file with the division, in a format prescribed by the director, a notice of controversion on or before the 21st day after the employer has knowledge of the alleged injury or death. If the employer controverts the right to compensation after payments have begun, the employer shall file with the division, in a format prescribed by the director, a notice of controversion not later than the date an installment of compensation payable without an award is due. When payment of temporary disability benefits is controverted solely on the grounds that another employer or another insurer of the same employer may be responsible for all or a portion of the benefits, the most recent employer or insurer who is party to the claim and who may be liable shall make the payments during the pendency of the dispute. When a final determination of liability is made, any reimbursement required, including interest at the statutory rate, and all costs and attorney fees incurred by the prevailing employer, shall be made not later than 14 days after the determination.

If any installment of compensation payable without an award is not paid within seven days after it becomes due, as provided in (b) of this section, there shall be added to the unpaid installment an amount equal to 25 percent of the installment. This additional amount shall be paid at the same time as, and in addition to, the installment, unless notice is filed under (d) of this section or unless the nonpayment is excused by the board after a showing by the employer that owing to conditions over which the employer had no control the installment could not be paid within the period prescribed for the payment. The additional amount shall be paid directly to the recipient to whom the unpaid installment was to be paid.

If compensation payable under the terms of an award is not paid within 14 days after it becomes due, there shall be added to that unpaid compensation an amount equal to 25 percent of the unpaid installment. The additional amount shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, the compensation, unless review of the compensation order making the award as provided under AS

23.30.008

and an interlocutory injunction staying payments is allowed by the court. The additional amount shall be paid directly to the recipient to whom the unpaid compensation was to be paid.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1981.]

The board may upon its own initiative at any time in a case in which payments are being made with or without an award, where right to compensation is controverted, or where payments of compensation have been increased, reduced, terminated, changed, or suspended, upon receipt of notice from a person entitled to compensation, or from the employer, that the right to compensation is controverted, or that payments of compensation have been increased, reduced, terminated, changed, or suspended, make the investigations, cause the medical examinations to be made, or hold the hearings, and take the further action which it considers will properly protect the rights of all parties.

When the director considers it advisable, the director may require an employer to make a deposit with the Department of Revenue to secure the prompt and convenient payment of the compensation, and payments from the deposit upon an award shall be made upon order of the director.

If an employer has made advance payments or overpayments of compensation, the employer is entitled to be reimbursed by withholding up to 20 percent out of each unpaid installment or installments of compensation due. More than 20 percent of unpaid installments of compensation due may be withheld from an employee only on approval of the board.

An injured employee or, in case of death, the employee’s dependents or personal representative shall give receipts for payment of compensation to the employer paying the compensation, and the employer shall produce the receipts for inspection by the director, whenever required.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 83 SLA 1975.]

On or before March 1 of each year, the insurer or adjuster shall file a verified annual report in a format prescribed by the director stating the total amount of all compensation by type, the number of claims received and the percentage controverted, medical and related benefits, vocational rehabilitation expenses, legal fees, including a separate total of fees paid to attorneys and fees paid for the other costs of litigation, and penalties paid on all claims during the preceding calendar year. If the annual report is timely and complete when received by the division and provides accurate information about each category of payments, the director shall review the timeliness of the insurer’s or adjuster’s reports filed during the preceding year under (c) of this section. If, during the preceding year, the insurer or adjuster filed at least 99 percent of the reports on time, the penalties assessed under (c) of this section shall be waived. If, during the preceding year, the insurer or adjuster filed at least 97 percent of the reports on time, 75 percent of the penalties assessed under (c) of this section shall be waived. If, during the preceding year, the insurer or adjuster filed 95 percent of the reports on time, 50 percent of the penalties assessed under (c) of this section shall be waived. If, during the preceding year, the insurer’s or adjuster’s reports have not been filed on time at least 95 percent of the time, none of the penalties assessed under (c) of this section shall be waived. The penalties that are not waived are due and payable when the insurer or adjuster receives notification from the director regarding the timeliness of the reports. If the annual report is not filed by March 1 of each year, the insurer or adjuster shall pay a civil penalty of $100 for the first day the annual report is late and $10 for each additional day the report is late. If the annual report is incomplete when filed, the insurer or adjuster shall pay a civil penalty of $1,000.

If the employer is self-insured or uninsured, the requirements of (c) and (m) of this section apply to the employer.

The director shall promptly notify the division of insurance if the board determines that the employer’s insurer has frivolously or unfairly controverted compensation due under this chapter. After receiving notice from the director, the division of insurance shall determine if the insurer has committed an unfair claim settlement practice under AS

21.36.125

.

An employer shall pay interest on compensation that is not paid when due. Interest required under this subsection accrues at the rate specified in AS

09.30.070(a)

that is in effect on the date the compensation is due.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 91 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 13 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 46 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1981; am § 15 ch 93 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1983; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 112 SLA 1984; am §§ 24 — 29 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 14 ch 105 SLA 2000; am §§ 44 — 52 ch 10 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 11 — 14, 22 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For present provisions covering the subject matter of former subsection (

l

), which limited total compensation payable under this chapter for injuries and certain disabilities, see
AS

23.30.190(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 22, 2018, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “in a format” for “on a form” following “must file a notice,”, and made a stylistic change in (a)(5); in (c), substituted “in a format” for “and the employee on a form” following “notify the division”
in the first sentence, substituted “not later than” for “with the division and sent to the employee within” following “shall be filed” in the second sentence, deleted “and the employee” following “notifying the division” in the third sentence, and made stylistic changes, in the third and fourth sentences, substituted “not later than” for “with the division and sent to the employee within” following “be filed”, added the fifth sentence, in the sixth sentence, substituted “division is” for “division and the employee are” near the beginning; in (d), in the first sentence, substituted “, in a format prescribed by the director,” for “and send to the employee” following “with the division”, in the second sentence, substituted “, in a format prescribed by the director a notice of controversion not later than the date” for “and send to the employee a notice of controversion within seven days after” following “with the division”, in the last sentence, substituted “not later than 14 days” for “within 14 days” following “shall be made”; in (m), substituted “in a format” for “on a form” following “verified annual report” in the first sentence; repealed (q).

Sec. 23.30.160.
Assignment and exemption of claims.

An assignment, release, or commutation of compensation or benefits due or payable under this chapter, except as provided by this chapter, is not valid.

Benefits payable under this chapter are exempt from levy to enforce the collection of a debt as provided in AS 09.38 (exemptions). This exemption may not be waived.

History.

(§ 15 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

The last sentence of (b) of this section was formerly the last sentence of (a).
It was placed in (b) in 1984 to correct a manifest error in the 1982 amendatory Act.

Sec. 23.30.165.
Lien.

Each employee and beneficiary entitled to compensation under the provisions of this chapter has a lien for the full amount of the compensation the person is entitled to, including costs and disbursements of suit and attorney fees allowed, upon all of the property in connection with the construction, preservation, maintenance, or operation of which the work of the employee was being performed at the time of the injury or death. For example: in the case of an employee injured or killed while engaged in mining or in work connected with mining, the lien extends to the entire mine and all property used in connection with it; and in the case of an employee injured or killed while engaged in fishing or in the packing, canning, or salting of fish, or other branch of the fish industry, the lien extends to the entire packing, fishing, salting, or canning plant or establishment and all property used in connection with it; and this is the case with other businesses, industries, works, occupations, and employments.

The lien is prior and paramount to any other lien on the property, except a lien for wages or materials as provided by law, and is of equal rank with a lien for wages or materials.

The lien extends to all right, title, interest, and claim of the employer in the property affected by the lien.

A person claiming a lien under this chapter shall, within one year after the date of the injury from which the claim of compensation arises, record in the office of the recorder of the recording district in which the property affected by the lien is located a notice of lien signed and verified by the claimant or someone on behalf of the claimant, and stating, in substance, the name of the person injured or killed out of which injury or death the claim of compensation arises, the name of the employer of the injured or deceased person at the time of the injury or death, a description of the property affected or covered by the lien, and the name of the owner or reputed owner of the property.

The lien for compensation provided for in this section may be enforced by equitable proceedings as in the enforcement of other liens upon real or personal property, within 10 months after the cause of action arises. Nothing in this section prevents an attachment of property as security for the payment of compensation.

History.

(§ 16 ch 163 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (d) of this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 23.30.170.
Collection of defaulted payments.

In case of default by the employer in the payment of compensation due under an award of compensation for a period of 30 days after the compensation is due, the person to whom the compensation is payable may, within one year after the default, apply to the board making the compensation order for a supplementary order declaring the amount of the default. After investigation, notice, and hearing, as provided in AS

23.30.110

, the board shall make a supplementary order declaring the amount of the default. The order shall be filed in the same manner as the compensation order.

If the payment in default is an installment of the award, the board may, in its discretion, declare the whole of the award as the amount in default. The applicant may file a certified copy of the supplementary order with the clerk of the superior court. The supplementary order is final. The court shall, upon the filing of the copy, enter judgment for the amount declared in default by the supplementary order if it is in accordance with law. Any time after a supplementary order by the board, the attorney general, when requested to do so by the commissioner, shall take appropriate action to assure collection of the defaulted payments.

Review of the judgment may be had as in a civil action for damages. Final proceedings to execute the judgment may be had by writ of execution. The court shall modify the judgment to conform to a later compensation order upon presentation of a certified copy of it to the court.

History.

(§ 17 ch 193 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1966)